Utah statutes.
17-27a-301.   Ordinance establishing planning commission required --
Exception -- Ordinance requirements -- Township planning commission --
Compensation.
(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), each county shall enact an
ordinance establishing a countywide planning commission for the unincorporated
areas of the county not within a township.
(b)  Subsection (1)(a) does not apply if all of the county is included within
any combination of:
(i)  municipalities; and
(ii)  townships with their own planning commissions.
(2)  The ordinance shall define:
(a)  the number and terms of the members and, if the county chooses, alternate
members;
(b)  the mode of appointment;
(c)  the procedures for filling vacancies and removal from office;
(d)  the authority of the planning commission; and
(e)  other details relating to the organization and procedures of the planning
commission.
(3) (a)  If the county establishes a township planning commission, the county
legislative body shall enact an ordinance defining appointment procedures,
procedures for filling vacancies and removing members from office, and other
details relating to the organization and procedures of each township planning
commission.
(b)  The planning commission for each township shall consist of seven members
who, except as provided in Subsection (3)(e), shall be appointed by:
(i)  in a county operating under a form of government in which the executive
and legislative functions of the governing body are separated, the county
executive with the advice and consent of the county legislative body; or
(ii)  in a county operating under a form of government in which the executive
and legislative functions of the governing body are not separated, the county
legislative body.
(c) (i)  Members shall serve four-year terms and until their successors are
appointed or, as provided in Subsection (3)(e), elected and qualified.
(ii)  Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection (3)(c)(i) and except as
provided in Subsection (3)(e), members of the first planning commissions shall
be appointed so that, for each commission, the terms of at least one member
and no more than two members expire each year.
(d) (i)  Except as provided in Subsection (3)(d)(ii), each member of a
township planning commission shall be a registered voter residing within the
township.
(ii) (A)  Notwithstanding Subsection (3)(d)(i), one member of a planning
commission of a township reconstituted under Laws of Utah 1997, Chapter 389,
or reinstated or established under Subsection 17-27a-306(1)(k)(i) may be an
appointed member who is a registered voter residing outside the township if
that member:
(I)  is an owner of real property located within the township; and
(II)  resides within the county in which the township is located.
(B) (I)  Each appointee under Subsection (3)(d)(ii)(A) shall be chosen by the
township planning commission from a list of three persons submitted by the
county legislative body.
(II)  If the township planning commission has not notified the county
legislative body of its choice under Subsection (3)(d)(ii)(B)(I) within 60
days of the township planning commission's receipt of the list, the county
legislative body may appoint one of the three persons on the list or a
registered voter residing within the township as a member of the township
planning commission.
(e) (i)  The legislative body of each county in which a township reconstituted
under Laws of Utah 1997, Chapter 389, or reinstated or established under
Subsection 17-27a-306(1)(e)(i) is located shall enact an ordinance that
provides for the election of at least three members of the planning commission
of that township.
(ii)  The election of planning commission members under Subsection (3)(e)(i)
shall coincide with the election of other county officers during even-numbered
years.  Approximately half the elected planning commission members shall be
elected every four years during elections held on even-numbered years, and the
remaining elected members shall be elected every four years on alternating
even-numbered years.
(f) (i) (A)  The legislative body of each county in which a township
reconstituted under Laws of Utah 1997, Chapter 389, or reinstated or
established under Subsection 17-27a-306(1)(e)(i) is located shall enact an
ordinance appointing each elected member of the planning and zoning board of
the former township, established under Laws of Utah 1996, Chapter 308, as a
member of the planning commission of the reconstituted or reinstated township.
Each member appointed under this subsection shall be considered an elected
member.
(B) (I)  Except as provided in Subsection (3)(f)(i)(B)(II), the term of each
member appointed under Subsection (3)(f)(i)(A) shall continue until the time
that the member's term as an elected member of the former township planning
and zoning board would have expired.
(II)  Notwithstanding Subsection (3)(f)(i)(B)(I), the county legislative body
may adjust the terms of the members appointed under Subsection (3)(f)(i)(A) so
that the terms of those members coincide with the schedule under Subsection
(3)(e)(ii) for elected members.
(ii)  Subject to Subsection (3)(f)(iii), the legislative body of a county in
which a township reconstituted under Laws of Utah 1997, Chapter 389, or
reinstated or established under Subsection 17-27a-306(1)(e)(i) is located may
enact an ordinance allowing each appointed member of the planning and zoning
board of the former township, established under Laws of Utah 1996, Chapter
308, to continue to hold office as a member of the planning commission of the
reconstituted or reinstated township until the time that the member's term as
a member of the former township's planning and zoning board would have
expired.
(iii)  If a planning commission of a township reconstituted under Laws of Utah
1997, Chapter 389, or reinstated or established under Subsection
17-27a-306(1)(e)(i) has more than one appointed member who resides outside the
township, the legislative body of the county in which that township is located
shall, within 15 days of the effective date of this Subsection (3)(f)(iii),
dismiss all but one of the appointed members who reside outside the township,
and a new member shall be appointed under Subsection (3)(b) no later than
August 16, 1997, to fill the position of each dismissed member.
(g) (i)  Except as provided in Subsection (3)(g)(ii), upon the appointment or
election of all members of a township planning commission, each township
planning commission under this section shall begin to exercise the powers and
perform the duties provided in Section 17-27a-302 with respect to all matters
then pending that previously had been under the jurisdiction of the countywide
planning commission or township planning and zoning board.
(ii)  Notwithstanding Subsection (3)(g)(i), if the members of a former
township planning and zoning board continue to hold office as members of the
planning commission of the township planning district under an ordinance
enacted under Subsection (3)(f), the township planning commission shall
immediately begin to exercise the powers and perform the duties provided in
Section 17-27a-302 with respect to all matters then pending that had
previously been under the jurisdiction of the township planning and zoning
board.
(4)  The legislative body may fix per diem compensation for the members of the
planning commission, based on necessary and reasonable expenses and on
meetings actually attended.
